Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Chapter 40. Alaska Railroad Corporation.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in enacting this chapter, see § 1, ch. 153, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for liability of a railroad for injury to livestock, see AS

42.30.150

—

42.30.190

.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent relating to ch. 153, SLA 1984 (SCS CSHB 512 (Fin) am S), see 1984 Senate Journal, p. 3221.